Vermont, session 2025-2026, S208.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
17 Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2373 is added to read:
18 § 2373. STANDARDS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT IDENTIFICATION

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.208
2026 Page 2 of 6
1 (a) Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to exercise
2 the power granted to Vermont by the 10th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution
3 to protect the health, safety, and welfare of its residents and law enforcement
4 officers present in the State by codifying standards for law enforcement
5 identification.
6 (b) Definitions. As used in this section:
7 (1) “Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in section
8 2351a of this title.
9 (2) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in section
10 2351a of this title and includes any officer of a federal law enforcement
11 agency or any person acting on behalf of a local, state, or federal law
12 enforcement agency.
13 (c) Identification requirements.
14 (1) A law enforcement officer shall be clearly identified by the officer’s
15 name or badge number, or both, on the officer’s uniform.
16 (2) A law enforcement officer shall not wear any mask or personal
17 disguise while interacting with the public in the performance of the officer’s
18 duties.
19 (3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, a law
20 enforcement officer may wear:
21 (A) a medical grade mask that is surgical;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.208
2026 Page 3 of 6
1 (B) an N95 respirator designed to prevent the transmission of
2 airborne diseases;
3 (C) a mask designed to protect against exposure to smoke during a
4 fire-involved situation;
5 (D) a mask necessary to perform duties during a water rescue
6 operation;
7 (E) a mask related to protection against exposure to biological or
8 chemical agents during an incident where these agents may be present; or
9 (F) a mask designed to protect against exposure to cold during a
10 declared weather emergency.
11 (4) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, the following is
12 permitted:
13 (A) Tactical Services Unit (TSU) team officers may use gear
14 necessary to protect their faces from physical harm while performing TSU
15 responsibilities.
16 (B) Law enforcement officers who participate in active undercover
17 drug-related operations or assignments may use a personal disguise when
18 necessary to perform such operations or assignments.
19 (d) Penalty. A law enforcement officer who violates subsection (c) of this
20 section shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or lose the officer’s
21 professional licensure or certification, if applicable, or both.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.208
2026 Page 4 of 6
1 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
2 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2373 is added to read:
§ 2373. STANDARDS FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT IDENTIFICATION
(a) Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to exercise
the power of Vermont, as recognized by the 10th Amendment to the U.S.
Constitution, to protect the health, safety, and welfare of its residents and law
enforcement officers present in the State by codifying standards for law
enforcement identification.
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Law enforcement agency” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title.
(2) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in section
2351a of this title and includes any officer of a federal law enforcement agency
or any person acting on behalf of a local, state, or federal law enforcement
agency.
(c) Identification requirements.
(1) A law enforcement officer shall be clearly identified by:
(A) the officer’s name or the officer’s unique radio or badge number
visibly displayed on the officer’s person; and
(B) the officer’s agency visibly displayed on the officer’s person.
(2) A law enforcement officer shall not wear any mask or personal
disguise while interacting in person with the public in the performance of the
officer’s duties.
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, a law
enforcement officer may wear:
(A) an N95 respirator or medical grade mask worn with the intent to
prevent the transmission of airborne diseases;
(B) a mask designed to protect against exposure to smoke during a
fire-involved situation;
(C) a mask necessary to perform duties during a water rescue
operation;
(D) a mask related to protection against exposure to biological or
chemical agents during an incident where these agents may be present; or

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.208
2026 Page 5 of 6
(E) a mask designed to protect against exposure to cold between
December 1 and April 1 when the National Weather Service is forecasting a
duration of cold weather at or below -10 degrees Fahrenheit, which includes
wind chill.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, the following is
permitted:
(A) Tactical Services Unit (TSU) team officers may use gear
necessary to protect their faces from physical harm while performing TSU
responsibilities.
(B) Law enforcement officers working with or in conjunction with the
Vermont Drug Task Force who participate in active undercover drug-related
operations or assignments may use a personal disguise when necessary to
perform such operations or assignments.
(C) Law enforcement officers who participate in active undercover
investigations relating to child sexual exploitation may use a personal disguise
when necessary to perform such investigations.
(d) Statewide policy. On or before January 1, 2027, the Vermont Criminal
Justice Council shall establish a statewide policy governing the standards for
law enforcement identification applicable to Vermont law enforcement
agencies to ensure consistent statewide application of the standards.
(e) Penalty. A law enforcement officer who violates subsection (c) of this
section shall be:
(1) for a first offense, assessed a civil penalty of not more than
$1,000.00; and
(2) for a second offense and subsequent offense, assessed a civil penalty
of not more than $2,500.00.
Sec. 2. 4 V.S.A. § 1102 is amended to read:
§ 1102. JUDICIAL BUREAU; JURISDICTION
(a) The Judicial Bureau is created within the Judicial Branch under the
supervision of the Supreme Court.
(b) The Judicial Bureau shall have jurisdiction of the following matters:
* * *
(37) Violations of 20 V.S.A. § 2373(c)(1) and (2), relating to standards
for law enforcement identification.
* * *

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.208
2026 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.